Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-202
Rules and regulations; acceptance of gratuities; conditions.

The Governor is hereby authorized to prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 55-201 to 55-219, governing the enlistment, organization, administration, equipment, maintenance, training and discipline of such forces; Provided, such rules and regulations, insofar as he deems practicable and desirable, shall conform to existing law, governing and pertaining to the National Guard and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and shall prohibit the acceptance of gifts, donations, gratuities or anything of value by such forces, except upon application to and authorization by the Adjutant General, or by any member of such forces from any individual, firm, association or corporation by reason of such membership. All applications for authority to make or offer a gift, donation, gratuity or anything of value to the forces shall become a permanent record of the Adjutant General's department and shall be open to public inspection.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 2, p. 447;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-402;

Laws 1943, c. 126, § 2, p. 428;

R.S.1943, § 55-202.